New York, session 2025-2026, S2671.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 9 of section 165 of the state finance law, as 2 added by a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the state finance law 3 relating to procurement requirements for end point device security, as 4 proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 5615 and A. 2833, is amended to 5 read as follows: 6 9. End point device security. (a) For the purposes of this subdivision 7 "end point device" shall mean personal computing goods that include 8 desktops, laptops, all-in-ones, tablets, mobile or cellular telephones, 9 thin clients, and monitors of various sizes; printers; and multi-func- 10 tional devices that include imaging devices that combine operations such 11 as copying, printing, scanning and faxing into one machine. 12 (b) The commissioner and all state agencies, when procuring end point 13 devices, shall [require those devices, services and solutions to meet] 14 be consistent with any relevant standards, guidelines, or guidance 15 developed as part of the National Institute of Standards and Technology 16 (NIST) Cybersecurity Framework. 17 [(c) Within one year of adoption of any amendments to the security 18 standards and guidelines referenced in paragraph (b) of this subdivision 19 the commissioner and each state agency shall update their end point 20 device procurement requirements.] 21 § 2. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 22 manner as a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the state finance law 23 relating to procurement requirements for end point device security, as 24 proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 5615 and A. 2833, takes effect. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02682-01-5